Illinois, session 104th, HB2761.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-47 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-47 new)7    Sec. 25-47. Master sports wagering licensee issued to a 8professional sports team.9    (a) If a public entity that owns a sports facility does not 10apply for a master sports wagering license, a professional 11sports team that (i) plays the majority of its home contests at 12the sports facility and (ii) has received written 13authorization from the public entity may apply to the Board 14for a master sports wagering license in place of the public 15entity and shall be deemed to be a sports facility for the 16purposes of this Act. A professional sports team granted a 17license under this Section must operate through a designee, as 18defined in subsection (a) of Section 25-40, and the designee 19shall be treated as the owner of the sports facility for all 20purposes under this Act or any rules adopted under the Act.21    (b) The initial license fee for a master sports wagering 22license for a professional sports team under this Section is 23$1,000,000, but the amount shall be adjusted 12 months after   HB2761- 2 -LRB104 08476 LNS 18528 b1the professional sports team licensee begins sportsbook 2operations based on 5% of its handle from the first 12 months 3of sportsbook operations. The master sports wagering license 4is valid for 4 years.5    (c) The Board may adopt rules necessary to implement this 6Section.